fr: Longueur de courbure du bec: Long; Moyen; Court; Autre
zh-CN: 正面长度: 长; 中; 短; 其他
de: Beleglänge: Lang; Mittel; Kurz; Sonstiges
sv: Vändlängd (för munstycke): Lång; Medium; Kort; Övrigt
hr-HR: Okrenuto prema duljini: Duga; Srednja; Kratka; Ostalo
vi: Chiều dài mặt tiếp xúc: Dài; Trung bình; Ngắn; Khác
bg-BG: Дължина на обточната/облицовъчната част: Дълго; Средно; Късо; Друго
it: Lunghezza di rivestimento: Lungo; Medio; Corto; Altro
ko: 페이싱 길이: 롱; 미디엄; 쇼트; 기타
ro-RO: Lungimea feței: Lung; Mediu; Scurt; Altele
cs: Délka dráhy: Dlouhé; Střední; Krátké; Jiné
pt-PT: Comprimento frontal: Longo; Médio; Curto; Outro
ja: 正面の長さ: ロング; ミディアム; ショート; その他
el: Μήκος όψης: Μακρύ; Μεσαίο; Κοντό; Άλλο
en: Facing length: Long; Medium; Short; Other
th: ความยาวด้านหน้า: ยาว; ปานกลาง; สั้น; อื่นๆ
ru: Длина фейсинга: Длинный; Средний; Короткий; Другое
fi: Kääntöpinnan pituus: Pitkä; Keskipitkä; Lyhyt; Muu
zh-TW: 吹嘴曲面長度: 長; 中; 短; 其他
nl: Facing-lengte: Lang; Medium; Kort; Overig
sk-SK: Dĺžka čelnej plochy: Dlhá; Stredná; Krátka; Iná
tr: Yüz uzunluğu: Uzun; Orta; Kısa; Diğer
pl: Długość lica: Długa; Średnia; Krótka; Inna
es: Largo frontal: Larga; Media; Corta; Otra
lt-LT: Atvirojo krašto ilgis: Ilgas; Vidutinis; Trumpas; Kitas
nb: Lengde på ansiktet: Lang; Medium; Kort; Annet
da: Frontens længde: Lang; Medium; Kort; Andet
hu: Szájrész hossza: Hosszú; Közepes; Rövid; Egyéb
sl-SI: Dolžina udarne plošče: Dolgo; Srednje; Kratko; Drugo
pt-BR: Comprimento frontal: Longo; Médio; Curto; Outros